Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-6721
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Medication Aide Act:

(1) Ability to take medications independently means the individual
is physically capable of (a) the act of taking or applying a dose of a medication,
(b) taking or applying the medication according to a specific prescription
or recommended protocol, and (c) observing and monitoring himself or herself
for desired effect, side effects, interactions, and contraindications of the
medication and taking appropriate actions based upon those observations;

(2) Administration of medication includes, but is not limited
to (a) providing medications for another person according to the five rights,
(b) recording medication provision, and (c) observing, monitoring, reporting,
and otherwise taking appropriate actions regarding desired effects, side effects,
interactions, and contraindications associated with the medication;

(3) Caretaker means a parent, foster parent, family member,
friend, or legal guardian who provides care for an individual;

(4) Child care facility means an entity or a person licensed
under the Child Care Licensing Act;

(5) Competent individual means an adult who is the ultimate
recipient of medication and who has the capability and capacity to make an
informed decision about taking medications;

(6) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(7) Direction and monitoring means the acceptance of responsibility
for observing and taking appropriate action regarding any desired effects,
side effects, interactions, and contraindications associated with the medication
by a (a) competent individual for himself or herself, (b) caretaker, or (c)
licensed health care professional;

(8) Facility means a health care facility or health care
service as defined in section 71-413 or 71-415 or an entity or person certified
by the department to provide home and community-based services;

(9) Five rights means getting the right drug to the right
recipient in the right dosage by the right route at the right time;

(10) Health care professional means an individual for whom
administration of medication is included in the scope of practice;

(11) Home means the residence of an individual but does not
include any facility or school;

(12) Intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disabilities has
the definition found in section 71-421;

(13) Informed decision means a decision made knowingly, based
upon capacity to process information about choices and consequences, and made
voluntarily;

(14) Medication means any prescription or nonprescription
drug intended for treatment or prevention of disease or to affect body function
in humans;

(15) Medication aide means an individual who is listed on
the medication aide registry operated by the department;

(16) Nonprescription drug has the definition found in section
38-2829;

(17) Nursing home means any facility or a distinct part of
any facility that provides care as defined in sections 71-420, 71-422, 71-424,
and 71-429;

(18) Prescription drug has the definition of prescription
drug or device as found in section 38-2841;

(19) Provision of medication means the component of the administration
of medication that includes giving or applying a dose of a medication to an
individual and includes helping an individual in giving or applying such medication
to himself or herself;

(20) PRN means an administration scheme in which a medication
is not routine, is taken as needed, and requires assessment for need and effectiveness;

(21) Recipient means a person who is receiving medication;

(22) Routine, with reference to medication, means the frequency
of administration, amount, strength, and method are specifically fixed; and

(23) School means an entity or person meeting the requirements
for a school set by Chapter 79.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 138;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 81;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 132;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 663;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1286;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 39.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.